Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-134
State budget; departmental budget estimates; Governor may alter.

The Governor shall have the right and authority to raise, lower or reject any requested appropriation or item therein, but in making any changes whatsoever, he shall give his reasons therefor in transmitting the budget to the Legislature.

Laws 1921, c. 210, § 10, p. 749;

C.S.1922, § 7277;

C.S.1929, § 81-310;

R.S.1943, § 81-134.